Utah statutes.
20A-6-401.   Ballots for municipal primary elections.

(1)  Each election officer shall ensure that:

(a) (i)  the ballot contains a perforated ballot stub at least one inch wide, placed across the top of the ballot;

(ii)  the ballot number and the words "Poll Worker's Initial ____" are printed on the stub; and

(iii)  ballot stubs are numbered consecutively;

(b)  immediately below the perforated ballot stub, the following endorsements are printed in 18-point bold type:

(i)  "Official Primary Ballot for ____ (City or Town), Utah";

(ii)  the date of the election; and

(iii)  a facsimile of the signature of the election officer and the election officer's title in eight-point type;

(c)  immediately below the election officer's title, two one-point parallel horizontal rules separate endorsements from the rest of the ballot;

(d)  immediately below the horizontal rules, an "Instructions to Voters" section is printed in 10 point bold type that states: "To vote for a candidate, place a cross (X) in the square following the name(s) of the person(s) you favor as the candidate(s) for each respective office." followed by two one-point parallel rules;

(e)  after the rules, the designation of the office for which the candidates seek nomination is printed flush with the left-hand margin and the words: "Vote for one" or "Vote for two or more" are printed to extend to the extreme right of the column in 10 point bold type, followed by a hair-line rule;

(f)  after the hair-line rule, the names of the candidates are printed in heavy face type between lines or rules 3/8 inch apart, alphabetically according to surnames with surnames last and grouped according to the office that they seek;

(g)  a square with sides not less than 1/4 inch long is printed immediately adjacent to the names of the candidates; and

(h)  the candidate groups are separated from each other by one light and one heavy line or rule.

(2)  A municipal primary ballot may not contain any space for write-in votes.

